verbo/espanol_verbo_potencial_imp.foma
define PotencImpYo1 [a r "$" "$"] -> {aría} || _ 1;
define PotencImpTu1 [a r "$" "$"] -> {arías} || _ 2;
define PotencImpElla1 [a r "$" "$"] -> {aría} || _ 3;
define PotencImpNos1 [a r "$" "$"] -> {aríamos} || _ 4;
define PotencImpVos1 [a r "$" "$"] -> {aríais} || _ 5;
define PotencImpUst1 [a r "$" "$"] -> {arían} || _ 6;

define PotencImpYo2 [e r "$" "$"] -> {ería} || _ 1;
define PotencImpTu2 [e r "$" "$"] -> {erías} || _ 2;
define PotencImpElla2 [e r "$" "$"] -> {ería} || _ 3;
define PotencImpNos2 [e r "$" "$"] -> {íamos} || _ 4;
define PotencImpVos2 [e r "$" "$"] -> {íais} || _ 5;
define PotencImpUst2 [e r "$" "$"] -> {ían} || _ 6;

define PotencImpYo3 [i r "$" "$"] -> {iría} || _ 1;
define PotencImpTu3 [i r "$" "$"] -> {irías} || _ 2;
define PotencImpElla3 [i r "$" "$"] -> {iría} || _ 3;
define PotencImpNos3 [i r "$" "$"] -> {iríamos} || _ 4;
define PotencImpVos3 [i r "$" "$"] -> {iríais} || _ 5;
define PotencImpUst3 [i r "$" "$"] -> {irían} || _ 6;

define PotencImp1 PotencImpYo1 .o. PotencImpTu1 .o. PotencImpElla1 .o. PotencImpNos1 .o. PotencImpVos1 .o. PotencImpUst1;
define PotencImp2 PotencImpYo2 .o. PotencImpTu2 .o. PotencImpElla2 .o. PotencImpNos2 .o. PotencImpVos2 .o. PotencImpUst2;
define PotencImp3 PotencImpYo3 .o. PotencImpTu3 .o. PotencImpElla3 .o. PotencImpNos3 .o. PotencImpVos3 .o. PotencImpUst3;

define PotencImp PotencImp1 .o. PotencImp2 .o. PotencImp3;
